West Virginia, session 2025, HB3263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. POWERS AND DUTIES OF PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION. §24-2-22. Service outage communication plans. (a) Each utility shall have an outage communication plan in place to notify customers of any planned and any unexpected disruption of utility services. Such outage communication plan shall, at a minimum, include a methodology for advance notification to all affected customers for planned service disruptions, methods of communication, and notification content requirements concerning the outage, including an estimate of the duration and end of the outage. (b) Each utility shall file its outage communication plan with the commission. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home